Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-5] Resident advisory boards;
establishment. (a) The authority may establish a resident advisory
board or boards, which shall be comprised of federal public housing residents
or section 8 tenant-based housing assistance recipients, to assist and make
recommendations to the authority regarding the development of the public
housing agency plan and any significant amendments or modifications to it. The
members of the resident advisory board or boards shall adequately reflect and
represent residents of federal public housing projects and recipients of
section 8 tenant-based assistance administered by the authority.

(b) The members of the resident advisory board
shall not be compensated for their services but shall be reimbursed for
necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred while engaged in
business for the resident advisory board.

(c) The authority may adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 91 with respect to the establishment of the resident
advisory board or boards, including rules concerning the composition,
eligibility, selection, and term of members. This section shall not apply if
it conflicts with any federal law. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next